Washington statutes.
RCW 36.55.030

Franchises on county bridges.

Any board of county commissioners may grant franchises upon bridges, trestles, or other structures constructed and maintained by it, severally or jointly with any other county or city or town of this state, or jointly with any other state or any county, city or town of any other state, in the same manner and under the same provisions as govern the granting of franchises on county roads.

[ 1963 c 4 s 36.55.030. Prior: 1937 c 187 s 40; RRS s 6450-40.]